District of Columbia statutes.
1-202.01

Redevelopment Land Agency.

(a)-(e)[Omitted].

(f)

For the purpose of § 1-207.13(d), employees in the District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency shall be deemed to be transferred to the District of Columbia as of January 2, 1975 without a break in service.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title II, § 201(f)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-206.03, § 1-601.01, § 1-1001.02, and § 47-335.02.

Editor's Notes

The text of § 1-202.01(a) through (e) is omitted because the corresponding text of section 201(a) through (e) of Public Law 93-198 amended another law.